New York, session 2025-2026, S2197.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 88 to read as follows: 3 88. Persons employed by the town of Southampton in Suffolk county as 4 animal control officers; provided, however that nothing in this subdivi- 5 sion shall be deemed to authorize such animal control officer to carry, 6 possess, repair or dispose of a firearm unless the appropriate license 7 has been issued pursuant to section 400.00 of the penal law. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06015-01-5